vi: Khả năng tương thích với trục mũi tên: Alpha (ID 0,297 in); G (ID 0,166 in); GT (ID 0,246 in); H (ID 0,233 in); HPX (ID 0,297/0,300 in); S (ID 0,244/0,245 in); Phổ thông/đa năng; X (ID 0,204 in); Khác
bg-BG: Съвместимост с тялото на стрелата: Alpha (0,297 инча вътрешен диаметър); G (0,166 инча вътрешен диаметър); GT (0,246 инча вътрешен диаметър); H (0,233 инча вътрешен диаметър); HPX (0,297/0,300 инча вътрешен диаметър); S (0,244/0,245 инча вътрешен диаметър); Универсална/за различни размери; X (0,204 инча вътрешен диаметър); Друго
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost osovine za strijele: Alpha (ID 0,297 in); G (ID 0,166 in); GT (ID 0,246 in); H (ID 0,233 in); HPX (ID 0,297 / 0,300 in); S (ID 0,244 / 0,245 in); Univerzalno / za više veličina; X (ID 0,204 in); Ostalo
ro-RO: Compatibilitatea tijei pentru săgeți: Alpha (0,297 in ID); G (0,166 in ID); GT (0,246 in ID); H (0,233 in ID); HPX (0,297/0,300 in ID); S (0,244/0,245 in ID); Universal/multi-fit; X (0,204 in ID); Altele
da: Pileskaftkompatibilitet: Alpha (0,297" ID); G (0,166" ID); GT (0,246" ID); H (0,233" ID); HPX (0,297/0,300" ID); S (0,244/0,245" ID); Universel/multi-fit; X (0,204" ID); Andet
nb: Kompatibilitet med pilskaft: Alpha (0,297 tommer ID); G (0,166 tommer ID); GT (0,246 tommer ID); H (0,233 tommer ID); HPX (0,297/0,300 tommer ID); S (0,244/0,245 tommer ID); Universell / passer flere; X (0,204 tommer ID); Annet
el: Συμβατότητα στελέχους βέλους: Alpha (0,297 in ID); G (0,166 in ID); GT (0,246 in ID); H (0,233 in ID); HPX (0,297/0,300 in ID); S (0,244/0,245 in ID); Γενικής χρήσης/πολλαπλών εφαρμογών; X (0,204 in ID); Άλλο
cs: Kompatibilita s dříkem šípu: Alpha (vnitřní průměr 0,297 in); G (vnitřní průměr 0,166 in); GT (vnitřní průměr 0,246 in); H (vnitřní průměr 0,233 in); HPX (vnitřní průměr 0,297 / 0,300 in); S (vnitřní průměr 0,244 / 0,245 in); Univerzální/víceúčelová; X (vnitřní průměr 0,204 in); Ostatní
en: Arrow shaft compatibility: Alpha (0.297 in ID); G (0.166 in ID); GT (0.246 in ID); H (0.233 in ID); HPX (0.297/0.300 in ID); S (0.244/0.245 in ID); Universal/multi-fit; X (0.204 in ID); Other
de: Pfeilschafkompatibilität: Alpha (0,297 Zoll ID); G (0,166 Zoll ID); GT (0,246 Zoll ID); H (0,233 Zoll ID); HPX (0,297/0,300 Zoll ID); S (0,244/0,245 Zoll ID); Universell/Multi-Fit; X (0,204 Zoll ID); Sonstige
zh-CN: 箭杆兼容性: Alpha（内径 0.297 英寸）; G（内径 0.166 英寸）; GT（内径 0.246 英寸）; H（内径 0.233 英寸）; HPX（内径 0.297/0.300 英寸）; S（内径 0.244/0.245 英寸）; 通用/多尺寸适配; X（内径 0.204 英寸）; 其他
tr: Ok mili uyumluluğu: Alfa (0,297 inç iç çap); G (0,166 inç iç çap); GT (0,246 inç iç çap); H (0,233 inç iç çap); HPX (0,297/0,300 inç iç çap); S (0,244/0,245 inç iç çap); Evrensel/çoklu uyum; X (0,204 inç iç çap); Diğer
es: Compatibilidad del asta de la flecha: Alpha (0,297 pulg. de DI); G (0,166 pulg. de DI); GT (0,246 pulg. de DI); H (0,233 pulg. de DI); HPX (0,297/0,300 pulg. de DI); S (0,244/0,245 pulg. de DI); Universal/multiajuste; X (0,204 pulg. de DI); Otra
hu: Nyíltengely kompatibilitása: Alpha (0,297 in belső átmérő); G (0,166 in belső átmérő); GT (0,246 in belső átmérő); H (0,233 in belső átmérő); HPX (0,297/0,300 in belső átmérő); S (0,244/0,245 in belső átmérő); Univerzális/több mérethez; X (0,204 in belső átmérő); Egyéb
ja: 矢軸の互換性: アルファ (内径 0.297インチ); G (内径 0.166インチ); GT (内径 0.246インチ); H (内径 0.233インチ); HPX (内径 0.297/0.300インチ); S (内径 0.244/0.245インチ); ユニバーサル・マルチフィット; X (内径 0.204インチ); その他
pl: Kompatybilność trzonu strzały: Alpha (ID 0,297 cala); G (ID 0,166 cala); GT (ID 0,246 cala); H (ID 0,233 cala); HPX (ID 0,297/0,300 cala); S (ID 0,244/0,245 cala); Uniwersalne / wielorozmiarowe; X (ID 0,204 cala); Inne
it: Compatibilità dell'albero Arrow: Alpha (ID 0,297 in); G (ID 0,166 in); GT (ID 0,246 in); H (ID 0,233 in); HPX (ID 0,297/0,300 in); S (ID 0,244/0,245 in); Universale/Multi-fit; X (ID 0,204 in); Altro
fi: Nuolivarren yhteensopivuus: Alpha (sisähalkaisija 0,297 tuumaa); G (sisähalkaisija 0,166 tuumaa); GT (sisähalkaisija 0,246 tuumaa); H (sisähalkaisija 0,233 tuumaa); HPX (sisähalkaisija 0,297 / 0,300 tuumaa); S (sisähalkaisija 0,244 / 0,245 tuumaa); Yleiskäyttöinen / useaan sopiva; X (sisähalkaisija 0,204 tuumaa); Muu
th: ความเข้ากันได้ของก้านลูกธนู: อัลฟ่า (ID 0.297 นิ้ว); G (ID 0.166 นิ้ว); GT (ID 0.246 นิ้ว); H (ID 0.233 นิ้ว); HPX (ID 0.297/0.300 นิ้ว); S (ID 0.244/0.245 นิ้ว); ใช้ได้ครอบจักรวาล/หลายขนาด; X (ID 0.204 นิ้ว); อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Compatibilidade da haste da flecha: Alpha (0,297 pol. ID); G (0,166 pol. ID); GT (0,246 pol. ID); H (0,233 pol. ID); HPX (0,297/0,300 pol. ID); S (0,244/0,245 pol. ID); Universal/Multi-fit; X (0,204 pol. ID); Outro
fr: Compatibilité des fûts de flèche: Alpha (0,297 po DI); G (0,166 po DI); GT (0,246 po DI); H (0,233 po DI); HPX (0,297/0,300 po DI); S (0,244/0,245 po DI); Universel/multi-taille; X (0,204 po DI); Autre
nl: Compatibiliteit pijlschacht: Alpha (0,297 inch ID); G (0,166 inch ID); GT (0,246 inch ID); H (0,233 inch ID); HPX (0,297/0,300 inch ID); S (0,244/0,245 inch ID); Universeel/multi-fit; X (0,204 inch ID); Overige
sk-SK: Kompatibilita s telami šípu: Alfa (ID 0,297 in); G (ID 0,166 in); GT (ID 0,246 in); H (ID 0,233 in); HPX (ID 0,297/0,300 in); S (ID 0,244/0,245 in); Univerzálne/pre viaceré veľkosti; X (ID 0,204 in); Iné
ko: 화살 샤프트 호환성: 알파(0.297인치 내경); G(0.166인치 내경); GT(0.246인치 내경); H(0.233인치 내경); HPX(0.297/0.300인치 내경); S(0.244/0.245인치 내경); 범용/멀티핏; X(0.204인치 내경); 기타
zh-TW: 箭桿相容性: Alpha (內徑 0.297 吋); G (內徑 0.166 吋); GT (內徑 0.246 吋); H (內徑 0.233 吋); HPX (內徑 0.297/0.300 吋); S (內徑 0.244/0.245 吋); 通用/多種適用; X (內徑 0.204 吋); 其他
pt-PT: Compatibilidade da haste da flecha: Alpha (0,297 pol. de diâmetro interno); G (0,166 pol. de diâmetro interno); GT (0,246 pol. de diâmetro interno); H (0,233 pol. de diâmetro interno); HPX (0,297/0,300 pol. de diâmetro interno); S (0,244/0,245 pol. de diâmetro interno); Universal/multiajuste; X (0,204 pol. de diâmetro interno); Outros
sl-SI: Združljivost cevk za puščice: Alpha (notranji premer 0,297 in); G (notranji premer 0,166 in); GT (notranji premer 0,246 in); H (notranji premer 0,233 in); HPX (notranji premer 0,297/0,300 in); S (notranji premer 0,244/0,245 in); Univerzalni/večnamenski; X (notranji premer 0,204 in); Drugo
sv: Pilskaftkompatibilitet: Alpha (0,297 tum ID); G (0,166 tum ID); GT (0,246 tum ID); H (0,233 tum ID); HPX (0,297/0,300 tum ID); S (0,244/0,245 tum ID); Universell/multi-fit; X (0,204 tum ID); Annat
lt-LT: Suderinamumas su strėlės kotu: „Alpha“ (0,297 col. vid. skersmuo); G (0,166 col. vid. skersmuo); GT (0,246 col. vid. skersmuo); H (0,233 col. vid. skersmuo); HPX (0,297 / 0,300 col. vid. skersmuo); S (0,244 / 0,245 col. vid. skersmuo); Universalus / įvairaus suderinamumo; X (0,204 col. vid. skersmuo); Kita
ru: Совместимость с древком стрелы: Alpha (внутр. диам. 0,297 дюйма); G (внутр. диам. 0,166 дюйма); GT (внутр. диам. 0,246 дюйма); H (внутр. диам. 0,233 дюйма); HPX (внутр. диам. 0,297/0,300 дюйма); S (внутр. диам. 0,244/0,245 дюйма); Универсальный; X (внутр. диам. 0,204 дюйма); Другое